Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Laws 2022, chapter 50, article 3, section 2, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Session Laws: 25-02663 Laws 2022, chapter 50, article 3, section 2 Sec. 2. new text begin LEGISLATIVE COVID-19 RESPONSE COMMISSION.new text end new text begin Laws 2020, chapter 71, article 1, section 7, as amended by Laws 2020, chapter 81, sections 1 and 2, is revived and reenacted as of December 30, 2020. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from December 30, 2020, and applies to duties required under this article. new text end